trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
<pardef n="karl__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dollar__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="yen__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mott__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lire__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="contain/er__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>er</l>          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="äpple__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / ~n / ~na -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bi__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~n / ~na -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="alfabet__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~en; invariable indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="badhus__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~en; indefinite genitive in ~ø -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="chips__n"> <!-- PT: Neuter; # / # / ~ / ~en;  -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bageri__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erna -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="gram__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~met / ~ / ~men -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bo__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~n / ~na -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ankar/e__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~e / ~et / ~e / ~na; invariable indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="antiken__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; # / ~ / # / #; only definite, no plural -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="godis__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / # / #; no plural, indefinite genitive in ~ø -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="karl">            <i>karl</i><par n="karl__n"/></e>
<e lm="barn">            <i>barn</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="däck">            <i>däck</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="chips">           <i>chips</i><par n="chips__n"/></e>
<e lm="höns">            <i>höns</i><par n="chips__n"/></e>
<e lm="ex">              <i>ex</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="fly">             <i>fly</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="frö">             <i>frö</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="gips">            <i>gips</i><par n="godis__n"/></e>
<e lm="kårhus">          <i>kårhus</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="prefix">          <i>prefix</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="skrå">            <i>skrå</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="spädbarn">        <i>spädbarn</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="trafikljus">      <i>trafikljus</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="batteri">         <i>batteri</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
<e lm="bi">              <i>bi</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="förhållande">     <i>förhållande</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="gränsvärde">      <i>gränsvärde</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="godis">           <i>godis</i><par n="godis__n"/></e>
<e lm="bo">              <i>bo</i><par n="bo__n"/></e>
<e lm="antiken">         <i>antiken</i><par n="antiken__n"/></e>
<e lm="fan">             <i>fan</i><par n="antiken__n"/></e>
<e lm="galleri">         <i>galleri</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
<e lm="kilogram">        <i>kilogram</i><par n="gram__n"/></e>
<e lm="kvarter">         <i>kvarter</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="paraply">         <i>paraply</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
<e lm="vin">             <i>vin</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
<e lm="rim">             <i>rim</i><par n="gram__n"/></e>
<e lm="us-dollar" a="PT"><i>us-dollar</i><par n="dollar__n"/></e>
<e lm="dollar" a="is">   <i>dollar</i><par n="dollar__n"/></e>
<e lm="glädje" a="is">   <i>glädje</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="forskningsprogram" a="is"><i>forskningsprogram</i><par n="gram__n"/></e>
<e lm="dödläge" a="is">  <i>dödläge</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="tjänstgörande" a="is"><i>tjänstgörande</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="fröken" a="is">   <i>fröken</i><par n="antiken__n"/></e>
<e lm="sovrum" a="is">   <i>sovrum</i><par n="gram__n"/></e>
<e lm="cent" c="domain:valuta" a="PT">            <i>cent</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
<e lm="container" a="SALDO">       <i>contain</i><par n="contain/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="fals" a="SALDO">            <i>fals</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="fyrverkeri" a="SALDO">      <i>fyrverkeri</i><par n="bageri__n"/></e>
<e lm="glasögon" a="SALDO">        <i>glasögon</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
<e lm="hänsyn" a="SALDO">          <i>hänsyn</i><par n="dollar__n"/></e>
<e lm="krypton" c="domain:kryptering" a="PT">         <i>krypton</i><par n="bo__n"/></e>
<e lm="lager" c="domain:mat" a="PT">           <i>lager</i><par n="contain/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="lire" c="domain:valuta" a="PT">            <i>lire</i><par n="lire__n"/></e>
<e lm="margarin" a="SALDO">        <i>margarin</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="mott" c="domain:djur" a="PT">            <i>mott</i><par n="mott__n"/></e>
<e lm="personal" a="SALDO">        <i>personal</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
<e lm="rand" c="domain:valuta" a="PT">            <i>rand</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
<e lm="skri" a="SALDO">            <i>skri</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="sovrum" a="SALDO">          <i>sovrum</i><par n="gram__n"/></e>
<e lm="spänn" a="SALDO">           <i>spänn</i><par n="dollar__n"/></e>
<e lm="yen" c="domain:valuta" a="PT">            <i>yen</i><par n="yen__n"/></e>
<e lm="sköte" c="style:sol" a="PT">              <i>sköte</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="kloankare" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>kloankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="lättviktsankare" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>lättviktsankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="plogankare" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>plogankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="stockankare" c="domain:sjöochhav" a="PT">              <i>stockankar</i><par n="ankar/e__n"/></e>
